Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1040.13b, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 214, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1040.13b), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1040.13b. A. As used in this section:
1. "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that
can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual
environments, including the ability to:
Req. No. 12340 Page 1

a. perceive real and virtual environments,
b. abstract perceptions made under this paragraph into
models through analysis in an automated manner, and
c. use model inference to formulate options for
information or action based on outcomes under
subparagraphs a and b of this paragraph.
The term includes generative artificial intelligence;
2. "Artificially generated sexual depiction" means a visual
depiction:
a. that appears to authentically depict an individual in
a state of nudity or engaged in sexual conduct that
did not occur in reality, and
b. the production of which was substantially dependent
upon technical means, including artificial
intelligence or photo editing software, rather than
the ability of another person to physically
impersonate the other person;
3. "Generative artificial intelligence" means the class of
models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data
in order to generate derived synthetic content, including
information such as images, videos, audio clips or text, that has
been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by
artificial intelligence;

Req. No. 12340 Page 2

4. "Image" includes a photograph, film, videotape, digital
recording or other depiction or portrayal of an object, including a
human body;
2. 5. "Intimate parts" means the fully unclothed, partially
unclothed or transparently clothed genitals, pubic area or female
adult nipple; and
3. 6. "Sexual act" means sexual intercourse including genital,
anal or oral sex; and
7. "Visual depiction" means any depiction, photograph, film,
performance, or image displayed, stored, shared, or transmitted in
any format and on any medium including data that is capable of being
converted into a depiction, picture, movie, performance, or image.
B. 1. A person commits nonconsensual dissemination of private
sexual images when he or she:
1. Intentionally
a. intentionally disseminates an image of another person
who is engaged in a sexual act or whose intimate parts
are exposed, in whole or in part;
2. Obtains,
b. obtains the image under circumstances in which a
reasonable person would know or understand that the
image was to remain private;, and
3. Disseminates

Req. No. 12340 Page 3

c. disseminates the image without the effective consent
of the depicted person.
2. A person commits nonconsensual dissemination of private
sexual images when he or she:
a. disseminates an artificially generated sexual
depiction of another person with the intent or with
reckless disregard to harass, annoy, threaten, alarm,
or cause physical, emotional, reputational, or
economic harm to the depicted person, and
b. disseminates the artificially generated sexual
depiction without the effective consent of the
depicted person.
C. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the
intentional dissemination of an image or artificially generated
sexual depiction of another identifiable person who is engaged in a
sexual act or whose intimate parts are exposed when:
1. The dissemination is made for the purpose of a criminal
investigation that is otherwise lawful;
2. The dissemination is for the purpose of, or in connection
with, the reporting of unlawful conduct;
3. The images or artificially generated sexual depictions
involve voluntary exposure in public or commercial settings; or
4. The dissemination serves a lawful purpose.

Req. No. 12340 Page 4

D. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose
liability upon the following entities solely as a result of content
or information provided by another person:
1. An interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C.,
Section 230(f)(2);
2. A wireless service provider, as defined in Section 332(d) of
the Telecommunications Act of 1996, 47 U.S.C., Section 151 et seq.,
Federal Communications Commission rules, and the Omnibus Budget
Reconciliation Act of 1993, Pub. L. No. 103-66; or
3. A telecommunications network or broadband provider.
E. A person convicted under this section is subject to the
forfeiture provisions in Section 1040.54 of this title.
F. Any person who violates the provisions of subsection B of
this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one
(1) year or by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00), or both such fine and imprisonment.
G. Any person who violates or attempts to violate the
provisions of subsection B of this section and who gains or attempts
to gain any property or who gains or attempts to gain anything of
value as a result of the nonconsensual dissemination or threatened
dissemination of private sexual images or artificially generated
sexual depictions shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony
punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Req. No. 12340 Page 5

Corr ections for not more than five (5) years. A second or
subsequent violation of this subsection shall be a felony punishable
by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for
not more than ten (10) years and the offender shall be required to
register as a sex offender under the Sex Offenders Registration Act.
H. The state shall not have the discretion to file a
misdemeanor charge, pursuant to Section 234 of Title 22 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, for a violation pursuant to subsection G of this
section.
I. The court shall have the authority to order the defendant to
remove the disseminated image or artificially generated sexual
depictions should the court find it is in the power of the defendant
to do so.
J. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the prosecution of a
person pursuant to the provisions of Section 1021.2, 1021.3, 1024.1,
1024.2, or 1040.12a of this title or any other applicable statute.
K. Any person who violates the provisions of subsection B of
this section by disseminating three or more images or artificially
generated sexual depictions within a six-month period shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the
custody of the Department of Corrections for not more than ten (10)
years.


Req. No. 12340 Page 6

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12340 GRS 02/03/25





















Req. No. 12340 Page 7